Tennessee, session 114, HB0060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 23, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "family restroom" means a separate, fully enclosed
restroom that:
(1) Has an outer door that can be locked by the occupant; and
(2) Is equipped to be used by one (1) or more:
(A) Persons with disabilities;
(B) Elderly persons;
(C) Children; or
(D) Persons who need the assistance of another person or a
relative when using restroom facilities.
(b) If a rest area or welcome center has a family restroom, then the department
of transportation shall install a sign or marker displaying a symbol indicating the
accessibility of a family restroom to motorists, or include that symbol on an existing rest
area or welcome center sign or marker, on the portions of the interstate system and
state system of highways and associated rights-of-way near the rest area or welcome
center.
HB0060
001038
- 1 -

(c) The department may consult the departments of safety and tourist
development in manufacturing and installing the signs or markers or designating or
placing symbols on signs or markers pursuant to this section.
(d) Symbols, signs, and markers installed pursuant to this section must be
consistent with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and the state
supplemental guidelines, as applicable.
(e) The department shall post on its website the rest areas and welcome centers
that have family restrooms.
(f) In consultation with the departments of safety and tourist development, the
department of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules necessary to effectuate
this section. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.
SECTION 2. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025,
the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001038